Mississippi, session 2026, HB1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-35-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-35-17.  Subject to available appropriations, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish an alternative state identification card that does not conflict with the requirements of the federal Real ID Act of 2005, except that this card shall not require proof of domicile for persons who do not have a domicile to list or a photograph for those who have a sincerely held religious belief that prohibits photography of themselves. SECTION 2.  Section 45-35-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-35-5.  Data for the issuance of an identification card shall include a birth certificate or other document to establish the age and identity of the applicant, the social security number of the applicant, and such other identifying data as is required on an application for issuance of a driver's license, except as otherwise provided in Section 45-35-17 for those who have a sincerely held religious belief that prohibits photography of themselves. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.